Utah statutes.
63J-4-505.   Powers of state agencies and local governments not limited.

This part does not limit powers conferred upon state departments, agencies, or instrumentalities of the state or political subdivisions by existing law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

